Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-604
Pupils; transportation; buses; routes, posting with signs.

The Department of Transportation shall post on state highways signs reading: Unlawful to pass school buses stopped to load or unload children. These signs shall be adequate in size and number to properly inform the public. School districts may obtain and post such signs on other bus route roads upon the approval of appropriate county officials. The Department of Transportation may furnish such signs at cost to school districts.

Laws 1959, c. 396, § 2, p. 1355;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-488.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 365;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 271.